Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-407
Estrays; owner unknown; procedure.

In case the owner of such stock is not known or found in the county, the distrainor of the stock so trespassing upon lands shall proceed as provided by law regulating estrays and the stock shall be held liable for all damages and costs.

Laws 1871, § 7, p. 121;

R.S.1913, § 115;

C.S.1922, § 123;

C.S.1929, § 54-407;

R.S.1943, § 54-407;

Laws 1996, LB 1174, § 7.